Vermont, session 2025-2026, S1.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. chapter 18, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Medicaid-Equivalent Coverage
§ 1851. MEDICAID-EQUIVALENT COVERAGE FOR ALL VERMONT
RESIDENTS
The Agency of Human Services shall provide hospital, medical, dental, and
prescription drug coverage equivalent to coverage in the Vermont Medicaid
state plan to all Vermont residents, regardless of their household income, as
follows:
(1) to individuals up to 26 years of age, for coverage beginning in 2029;
(2) to individuals who are not less than 55 years of age and not more
than the age of eligibility for the federal Medicare program, for coverage
beginning in 2030;
(3) to individuals who are not less than 45 years of age and not more
than 54 years of age, for coverage beginning in 2031;
(4) to individuals who are not less than 35 years of age and not more
than 44 years of age, for coverage beginning in 2032; and
(5) to individuals who are not less than 26 years of age and not more
than 34 years of age, for coverage beginning in 2033, at which time all
Vermont residents shall be eligible for coverage.
VT LEG #378801 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.1
2025 Page 3 of 5
Sec. 2. GLOBAL COMMITMENT WAIVER AMENDMENT
(a) On or before September 1, 2025, the Secretary of Human Services shall
request approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
amend Vermont’s Global Commitment to Health Section 1115 Demonstration
Waiver to make all Vermont residents eligible for hospital, medical, dental,
and prescription drug coverage equivalent to coverage in the Vermont
Medicaid state plan, regardless of income, as set forth in 33 V.S.A. § 1851.
(b) In the event that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does
not approve Vermont’s request for federal financial participation in providing
Medicaid-equivalent coverage to all Vermonters, regardless of income, the
coverage shall be funded with State-only dollars.
Sec. 3. AGENCY OF HUMAN SERVICES; COST ESTIMATES;
IMPLEMENTATION PLAN; REPORT
(a) The Agency of Human Services, in consultation with the Green
Mountain Care Board and the Department of Financial Regulation, shall:
(1) estimate the costs of providing hospital, medical, dental, and
prescription drug coverage equivalent to coverage in the Vermont Medicaid
state plan to all Vermont residents as set forth in 33 V.S.A. § 1851, including
the amount of State funds that would be required to support the program
through full implementation in 2033 both with and without federal Medicaid
dollars;
VT LEG #378801 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.1
2025 Page 4 of 5
(2) estimate the potential cost offsets in the health care system and
elsewhere in the economy as a result of all Vermont residents having access to
Medicaid-equivalent coverage; and
(3) develop and propose a detailed implementation plan for providing
Medicaid-equivalent coverage to all Vermont residents, beginning with
individuals up to 26 years of age in 2029 and continuing through full
implementation in 2033.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Agency of Human Services shall
provide its cost and cost-offset estimates and implementation plan to the House
Committees on Health Care, on Appropriations, and on Ways and Means and
the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare, on Appropriations, and on
Finance.
Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF TAXES; PAYROLL TAX OPTIONS; REPORT
On or before January 15, 2027, the Department of Taxes, in consultation
with the Agency of Human Services, shall provide to the House Committees
on Health Care and on Ways and Means and the Senate Committees on Health
and Welfare and on Finance options for structuring a payroll tax to generate
the revenue necessary to support the State portion of the Medicaid and CHIP
expansion established in Sec. 1 of this act, both with and without federal
Medicaid dollars, based on the Agency’s cost estimates developed pursuant to
Sec. 3 of this act and any subsequent additional fiscal analysis. The
VT LEG #378801 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.1
2025 Page 5 of 5
Department’s report shall set forth at least three payroll tax options and shall
include the Department’s recommendation for which option is the most
administratively feasible for employers, employees, and the State.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 1 (33 V.S.A. § 1851; Medicaid-equivalent coverage for all
Vermont residents) shall take effect on January 1, 2029.
(b) The remainder of this act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378801 v.1